California, session 20252026, SB1165.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7145.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7145.5. (a) The registrar may refuse to issue, reinstate, reactivate, or renew a license or may suspend a license for the failure of a licensee to resolve all outstanding final liabilities, which include taxes, additions to tax, penalties, interest, and any fees that may be assessed by the board, the Department of Industrial Relations, the Employment Development Department, the Franchise Tax Board, the State Board of Equalization, or the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.(1) Until the debts covered by this section are satisfied, the qualifying person and any other personnel of record named on a license that has been suspended under this section shall be prohibited from serving in any capacity that is subject to licensure under this chapter, but shall be permitted to act in the capacity of a nonsupervising bona fide employee.(2) The license of any other renewable licensed entity with any of the same personnel of record that have been assessed an outstanding liability covered by this section shall be suspended until the debt has been satisfied or until the same personnel of record disassociate themselves from the renewable licensed entity.(b) The refusal to issue a license or the suspension of a license as provided by this section shall be applicable only if the registrar has mailed a notice preliminary to the refusal or suspension that indicates that the license will be refused or suspended by a date certain. This preliminary notice shall be mailed to the licensee at least 60 days before the date certain.(c) In the case of outstanding final liabilities assessed by the Franchise Tax Board, this section shall be operative within 60 days after the board has provided the Franchise Tax Board with the information required under Section 30, relating to licensing information that includes the federal employer identification number, individual taxpayer identification number, or social security number.(d) All versions of the application for a contractor’s license shall include, as part of the application, an authorization by the applicant, in the form and manner mutually agreeable to the Franchise Tax Board, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, and the board, for the Franchise Tax Board and the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration to disclose the tax information that is required for the registrar to administer this section. The Franchise Tax Board and the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may from time to time audit these authorizations.(e) (1)In the case of outstanding final liabilities assessed by the State Board of Equalization or the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, this section shall not apply to any outstanding final liability if the licensee has entered into a written installment payment agreement for that liability with the State Board of Equalization or the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, as applicable, and is in compliance with the terms of that agreement.(2)The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may request that the registrar suspend a license or refuse to issue, reinstate, reactivate, or renew a license of a licensee with an outstanding final liability assessed by the California Department Tax and Fee Administration unless the licensee has entered into a written installment payment agreement and is in compliance with the terms of that agreement pursuant to paragraph (1).(3)A request made pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be in writing and identify the licensee and the licensee’s outstanding final liability.(4)The California Department Tax and Fee Administration shall give written notice to a licensee of its intent to request that the registrar suspend the licensee’s license, or to refuse to issue, reinstate, reactivate, or renew the license of a licensee pursuant to paragraph (2).(A)The notice required by this paragraph may be served personally, by mail, to the licensee’s last known mailing address on file with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, or by secure electronic transmission, to an address for electronic mail previously provided by the licensee.(B)If served by mail, the notice required by this paragraph shall be placed in a sealed envelope, with postage paid, addressed to the person at the address as it appears in the records of the California Department Tax and Fee Administration. The mailing of the notice shall be deemed complete at the time of the deposit of the notice in the United States Post Office, or a mailbox, sub-post office, substation or mail chute, or other facility regularly maintained or provided by the United States Postal Service, without extension of time for any reason.(f)The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may prescribe, adopt, and enforce regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this section.